West Virginia, session 2026, HB4587.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 1D. HIGHER EDUCATION ACCOUNTABILITY. §18B-1D-13. Duties of the Higher Education Policy Council. The Higher Education Policy Council shall:(1) Adopt rules to prohibit state funds from being allocated or expended, either directly or indirectly, for low-earning degree programs. These restrictions shall include, but are not limited to, the following categories of higher education funding:(A) Individual student financial aid;(B) Base operational or instructional funding;(C) Separately or specially appropriated aid or grants; and(D) Capital or facilities funding.(2) Annually review updated federal determinations of low-earning outcome programs under section 84001 of Public Law No. 119-21 and adopt rules in accordance with subsection (1).(3) Submit an annual and publicly available report to the legislature documenting:(A) Programs prohibited from receiving state aid;(B) Enforcement of such prohibitions; and(C) The estimated fiscal impact due to the prohibitions. §18B-1D-14. Limitations on administering higher education aid. A political subdivision of this state shall not allocate or expend local public funds, either directly or indirectly, for low-earning outcome degree programs as determined under §18B-1D-13 of this code. §18B-1D-15. Effective date. This act shall take effect upon passage.